test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-elama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - elama: # Verb 'to be' - full paradigm


# Isikulised olevikuvormid

     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: elan
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: elad
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: elab
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: elame
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: elate
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: elavad
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: ela

     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: elaksin
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: elaksid
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: elaksime
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: elaksite
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: elaksid
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Aff: elaks
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Neg: elaks

     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2+Aff: ela
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2+Neg: ela
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg3+Aff: elagu
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg3+Neg: elagu
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Aff: elagem
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Neg: elagem
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2+Aff: elage
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2+Neg: elage
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl3+Aff: elagu
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl3+Neg: elagu

     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot+Aff: elavat
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot+Neg: elavat

# Isikulised minevikuvormid

     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg1+Aff: elasin
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg2+Aff: elasid
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg3+Aff: elas
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl1+Aff: elasime
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl2+Aff: elasite
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl3+Aff: elasid
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Neg: elanud

     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Sg1+Aff: elanuksin
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Sg2+Aff: elanuksid
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl1+Aff: elanuksime
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl2+Aff: elanuksite
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl3+Aff: elanuksid
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Aff: elanuks
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Neg: elanuks

     elama+V+Pers+Past+Quot+Aff: elanuvat
     elama+V+Pers+Past+Quot+Neg: elanuvat

# Isikulised käändelised vormid

     elama+V+Pers+Past+Prc: elanud
     elama+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: elav
     elama+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: elamata
     elama+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: elamast
     elama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: elama
     elama+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: elamas
     elama+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: elamaks

# Umbisikuline olevik

     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: elatakse
     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: elata

     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Aff: elataks
     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Neg: elataks

     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Aff: elatagu
     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Neg: elatagu

     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Aff: elatavat
     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Neg: elatavat

# Umbisikuline minevik 
     elama+V+Impers+Past+Ind+Aff: elati
     elama+V+Impers+Past+Ind+Neg: elatud

     elama+V+Impers+Past+Cond+Aff: elatuks
     elama+V+Impers+Past+Cond+Neg: elatuks

     # ??? 
     elama+V+Impers+Past+Quot+Aff: elatuvat
     elama+V+Impers+Past+Quot+Neg: elatuvat
     
# Umbisikulised käändelised vormid?

     elama+V+Impers+Sup: elatama     

     elama+V+Ger: elades
     elama+V+Inf: elada

     elama+V+Impers+Past+Prc: elatud
     elama+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: elatav

# The verb forms list should be complete now
